Idaho, session 2026, S1380.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Endowment Fund Investment Board $3,700
from the Endowment Earnings Administrative Fund to be expended for capital
outlay for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.